North Dakota, session 69, SB2198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 37-01-25 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-01-25. Officers and employees of state or political subdivisions in national guard or
federal service to retain status for period of active service or any military duty.
All officers and employees of this state or of a political subdivision of this state who:
1. Are membersFor purposes of this section, "officer or employee" means:
a. A member of the national guard;
2. b. Are membersA member of the armed forces reserve of the United States of America;
3. c. Shall beAn individual subject to call in the federal service by the president of the United
States; or
4. d. Shall volunteerAn individual who volunteers for such federal service,.
2. An officer or employee of the state or a political subdivision, when ordered by proper authority
to active noncivilian employment for any military duty, areis entitled to a leave of absence from
suchthe civil service for the period of suchthe active service or military duty including traveling
to and from a duty station without loss of status or efficiency rating.
3. If such persons havethe individual has been in the continuous employ of the state or political
subdivision for ninety days immediately preceding the leave of absence, they shall receivethe
individual is entitled to twenty workdays each calendar year without loss of pay. In addition,
any
4. A leave of absence necessitated by a full or partial mobilization of the reserve and national
guard forces of the United States of America, or emergency state active duty, must be without
loss of pay for the first thirty days thereofof the absence less any other paid leave of absence
which may have been granted during the calendar year pursuant toin accordance with this
section.
5. If leave is required for any military duty or travel to and from a duty station on a day in which a
public officer or employee is scheduled to perform the work of the state or of a political
subdivision, the officer or employee must be given the option of time:
a. Time off with a concurrent loss of pay for the period missed, the use;
b. Use of leave of absence without loss of pay for the period missed,; or an opportunity

S. B. NO. 2198 - PAGE 2
c. Opportunity to reschedule the workperiod so the reserve or national guard military duty or
travel to and from a duty station occurs during time off from work without loss of status or
efficiency rating.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 37-01-40 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. A "veteran" is an individual who has served on continuous federalized active militaryuniformed
services duty for one hundred eighty days or the full period for which the individual was called
or ordered to active military duty for reasons other than training, and who was discharged or
released under other than dishonorable conditions. A discharge reflecting "expiration of term
of service" or "completion of required service" or words to that effect qualifies the shorter term
of service as making the individual a veteran.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 37-14-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-14-01.1. Definition of veteran.
1. As used in this chapter, "veteran" means:
a. An individual who served in the armed forces of the United States on federal active duty:
(1) For reasons other than training and who has been discharged under other than
dishonorable conditions Defined as a veteran under subsection 1 of section
37 - 01 - 40 ; or
(2) To whom the United States veterans administration has assigned a
service-connected disability rating;
b. Current members of the national guard or reserve; or
c. Former members of the national guard or reserve who have been discharged under other
than dishonorable conditions.
2. Subdivisions b and c of subsection 1 do not apply to section 37-14-14.
SECTION 4. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2198 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2198 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State